Utah statutes.
70C-2-101.   Finance and other charges.

Except where restricted or otherwise covered by provisions of this title, the parties to a consumer credit agreement may contract for payment by the debtor of any finance charge and other charges and fees.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

